Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.040

Reestablishment of entity scheduled for termination—Review. (Expires June 30, 2025.)

Any state entity scheduled for termination by the processes provided in this chapter may be reestablished by the legislature for a specified period of time or indefinitely. The legislature may again review the state entity in a manner consistent with the provisions of this chapter and reestablish, modify, or consolidate such state entity or allow it to be terminated.

[ 2000 c 189 s 3; 1983 1st ex.s. c 27 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 4.]